src/fst/affixes/propernouns.lexc
!! Proper noun inflection
! ----------------------
!! The Võro language proper nouns inflect in the same cases as regular
!! nouns, but with a colon (':') as separator.

LEXICON PROP_
:   # ;

LEXICON PROP_1HANS1A !!= @CODE@ 1 hanśa:hanśa
 PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_1HANS1A-SG ;
@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_1HANS1A-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_1HANS1A-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_1HANS1A-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_1HANS1A-PL
:%{back%}     NMN_1HANS1A-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_1VIU !!= @CODE@ 1 viu:viu
 PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_1VIU-SG ;
@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_1VIU-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_1VIU-SG
:%{back%} NMN_1VIU-SG ; 
LEXICON PROP_1VIU-PL
:%{back%} NMN_1VIU-PL ; 


LEXICON PROP_1HERRAE !!= @CODE@ 1 herrä:herrä
 PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_1HERRAE-SG ;
@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_1HERRAE-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_1HERRAE-SG
:%{front%} NMN_1HERRAE-SG ; 
LEXICON PROP_1HERRAE-PL
:%{front%} NMN_1HERRAE-PL ; 

!LEXICON PROP_1PREI !!= @CODE@ 1 prei:prei
! PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
! @U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_1PREI-SG ;
! @U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_1PREI-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_1PREI-SG
!: NMN_1PREI-SG ; 
!LEXICON PROP_1PREI-PL
!: NMN_1PREI-PL ; 

LEXICON PROP_2ARTIKLI
!! * Yaml: **suhvli**
 PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_2ARTIKLI-SG ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_2ARTIKLI-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_2ARTIKLI-SG
:%{back%} NMN_2ARTIKLI-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_2ARTIKLI-PL
:%{back%} NMN_2ARTIKLI-PL ;


LEXICON PROP_2KERGE
!! * Yaml: **kerge**
 PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_2KERGE-SG ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_2KERGE-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_2KERGE-SG
:%{front%} NMN_2KERGE-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_2KERGE-PL
:%{front%} NMN_2KERGE-PL ;


!LEXICON PROP_3PERAEDUE !!= @CODE@ perädü:perädü
!!! * Yaml: __peraedue__
! PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_3PERAEDUE-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_3PERAEDUE-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_3PERAEDUE-SG
!:%{front%}     NMN_3PERAEDUE-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_3PERAEDUE-PL
!:%{front%}     NMN_3PERAEDUE-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_3ALADU !!= @CODE@ aladu:aladu
!! * Yaml: **peraedue**
 PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
@U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_3ALADU-SG ;
@U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_3ALADU-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_3ALADU-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_3ALADU-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_3ALADU-PL
:%{back%}     NMN_3ALADU-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_VERE !!= @CODE@ Rakvere:Rakv
!! * Yaml: **Rakvere**
:ere PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
@U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_VERE-SG ;
@U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_VERE-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_VERE-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_VERE-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_VERE-PL
:%{back%}     NMN_VERE-PL ;


!LEXICON PROP_4TERVUES
!! * Yaml: **tervues**
! PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_4TERVUES-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_4TERVUES-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_4TERVUES-SG
!:%{front%}     NMN_4TERVUES-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_4TERVUES-PL
!:%{front%}     NMN_4TERVUES-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_4AINUS
!! * Yaml: **A-ainus**
! PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_4AINUS-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_4AINUS-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_4AINUS-SG
!:%{back%}     NMN_4AINUS-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_4AINUS-PL
!:%{back%}     NMN_4AINUS-PL ;


LEXICON PROP_5OPPAJA
!! * Yaml: **N-oppaja5**
 PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
@U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_5OPPAJA-SG ;
@U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_5OPPAJA-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_5OPPAJA-SG
:%{back%} NMN_5OPPAJA/MAENGJAE-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_5OPPAJA-PL
:%{back%} NMN_5OPPAJA/MAENGJAE-PL ;


LEXICON PROP_5MAENGJAE
!! * Yaml: **N-oppaja5**
 PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
@U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_5MAENGJAE-SG ;
@U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_5MAENGJAE-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_5MAENGJAE-SG
:%{front%} NMN_5OPPAJA/MAENGJAE-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_5MAENGJAE-PL
:%{front%} NMN_5OPPAJA/MAENGJAE-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_6MAKW
! PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_6MAKW-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_6MAKW-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_6MAKW-SG
!:%{back%} NMN_6MAKW/HELLE-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_6MAKW-PL
!:%{back%} NMN_6MAKW/HELLE-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_7FUEUESIGA
!! * Yaml: **fueuesiga**
! PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_7FUEUESIGA-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_7FUEUESIGA-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_7FUEUESIGA-SG
!:%{back%}     NMN_7FUEUESIGA-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_7FUEUESIGA-PL
!:%{back%}     NMN_7FUEUESIGA-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_8KASK
!:a PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_8KASK-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_8KASK-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_8KASK-SG
!:%{back%} NMN_8KASK/HAEIELM-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_8KASK-PL
!:%{back%} NMN_8KASK/HAEIELM-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_8HAEIELM
!:ä PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_8HAEIELM-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_8HAEIELM-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_8HAEIELM-SG
!:%{front%} NMN_8KASK/HAEIELM-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_8HAEIELM-PL
!:%{front%} NMN_8KASK/HAEIELM-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_8DOLLAR1
:%^NoPAL%>i PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_8DOLLAR1-SG ;
@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_8DOLLAR1-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_8DOLLAR1-SG
:%{back%} NMN_8DOLLAR1/EEDER1-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_8DOLLAR1-PL
:%{back%} NMN_8DOLLAR1/EEDER1-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_8WILDE
:%>'i PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_8WILDE-SG ;
@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_8WILDE-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_8WILDE-SG
:%{back%} NMN_8WILDE/DRAKE-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_8WILDE-PL
:%{back%} NMN_8WILDE/DRAKE-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_8DRAKE
:%>'i PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_8DRAKE-SG ;
@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_8DRAKE-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_8DRAKE-SG
:%{front%} NMN_8WILDE/DRAKE-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_8DRAKE-PL
:%{front%} NMN_8WILDE/DRAKE-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_8SADANG
: PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_8SADANG-SG ;
@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_8SADANG-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_8SADANG-SG
:%{back%} NMN_8SADANG-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_8SADANG-PL
:%{back%} NMN_8SADANG-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_8EEDER1
:ä PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_8EEDER1-SG ;
@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_8EEDER1-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_8EEDER1-SG
:%{front%} NMN_8DOLLAR1/EEDER1-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_8EEDER1-PL
:%{front%} NMN_8DOLLAR1/EEDER1-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_36SILM !!= * @CODE@ silm:silm
!! harmony: front
!:ä PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_36SILM-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_36SILM-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_36SILM-SG
!:%{front%} NMN_36RAMM/SILM-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_36SILM-PL
!:%{front%} NMN_36RAMM/SILM-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_9KIPWN1
!! kipõń:kipõń
!! * Yaml: **N-ellaei4, N-kipwnj9**
!:%^Pen%^WGStem%>a PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_9KIPWN1-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_9KIPWN1-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_9KIPWN1-SG
!:%{back%}     NMN_9KIPWN1/VETEL1-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_9KIPWN1-PL
!:%{back%}     NMN_9KIPWN1/VETEL1-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_9SALLAI
!! sallai:sallai
!! * Yaml: **N-ellaei4, N-kipwnj9**
!:%^Pen%^WGStem%>ä PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_9SALLAI-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_9SALLAI-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_9SALLAI-SG
!:%{back%} NMN_9SALLAI/ELLAEI-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_9SALLAI-PL
!:%{back%} NMN_9SALLAI/ELLAEI-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_9ELLAEI
!! elläi:elläi
!! * Yaml: **N-ellaei4, N-kipwnj9**
!:%^Pen%^WGStem%>ä PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_9ELLAEI-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_9ELLAEI-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_9ELLAEI-SG
!:%{front%} NMN_9SALLAI/ELLAEI-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_9ELLAEI-PL
!:%{front%} NMN_9SALLAI/ELLAEI-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_9TUKWV
!! tukõv:tukõv
!! * Yaml: **N-ellaei4, N-kipwnj9**
:%^Pen%^WGStem%>ä PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
@U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_9TUKWV-SG ;
@U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_9TUKWV-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_9TUKWV-SG
:%{back%} NMN_9TUKWV/VERREV-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_9TUKWV-PL
:%{back%} NMN_9TUKWV/VERREV-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_10HWRAK !!= @CODE@ hõrak:hõrak
!:%^WGStem%>a PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_10HWRAK-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_10HWRAK-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_10HWRAK-SG
!:%{back%}     NMN_10HWRAK-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_10HWRAK-PL
!:%{back%}     NMN_10HWRAK-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_10AMEERIGA !!= @CODE@ Ameeriga:Ameerik
!! cf. _10HWRAK
:%^WGStem%>a PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_10AMEERIGA-SG ;
@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_10AMEERIGA-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_10AMEERIGA-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_10AMEERIGA-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_10AMEERIGA-PL
:%{back%}     NMN_10AMEERIGA-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_10HAIDAK !!= @CODE@ haidak:haidak
!:%^WGStem%>u PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_10HAIDAK-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_10HAIDAK-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_10HAIDAK-SG
!:%{back%}     NMN_10HAIDAK/ESAEK-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_10HAIDAK-PL
!:%{back%}     NMN_10HAIDAK/ESAEK-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_10ESAEK !!= @CODE@ esäk:esäk
:%^WGStem%>u PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_10ESAEK-SG ;
@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_10ESAEK-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_10ESAEK-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_10HAIDAK/ESAEK-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_10ESAEK-PL
:%{front%}     NMN_10HAIDAK/ESAEK-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_10RAAMAT !!= @CODE@ raamat:raamat
!:%^WGStem%>u PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_10RAAMAT-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_10RAAMAT-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_10RAAMAT-SG
!:%{back%}     NMN_10RAAMAT/LEMBIT-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_10RAAMAT-PL
!:%{back%}     NMN_10RAAMAT/LEMBIT-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_10LEMBIT !!= @CODE@ Lembit:Lembi%{td%}
:%{front%}%^WGStem%>%{uü%} PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_10LEMBIT-SG ;
@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_10LEMBIT-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_10LEMBIT-SG
:%{front%}     NMN_10RAAMAT/LEMBIT-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_10LEMBIT-PL
:%{front%}     NMN_10RAAMAT/LEMBIT-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_10VIDRIK !!= @CODE@ vidrik:vidrik
!! gradation: no
:%^WGStem%>u PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_10VIDRIK-SG ;
@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_10VIDRIK-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_10VIDRIK-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_10VIDRIK-SG ;
